Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Chapter 7. Fees
§ 25-7-39.
Payment of surveyor fees.

The fees chargeable by the surveyor shall be paid by the parties engaging his services. When the services are rendered in obedience to an order of court in a suit therein pending, the surveyor shall state an account of the fees for services, written on the back of one (1) of the plats by him returned to the court, and the same shall be allowed in the bill of costs and taxed as other costs.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 458; 1892, § 2014; 1906, § 2190; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1871; 1930, § 1800; 1942, § 3948; brought forward and amended, Laws, 2016, ch. 366, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 25-7-41.
Rangers.

Rangers shall be entitled to the following fees:

For taking the information of the taker up of animal, and issuing summons for appraisers. . . . .$ .50

For registering the certificate. . . . . .50

Advertising estray. . . . .1.00

For making sale. . . . . .50

And ten per centum commissions on the amount of sales.

For taking proof of title, and order for delivery of estray to the owner. . . . . .50

And there shall be allowed to the taker up the sum of five dollars and his necessary expenses for keeping the estray; but if two or more estrays of the same species are taken up by the same person at the same time, they shall be included in one information, registry, and advertisement, and fees shall be allowed to the ranger and taker up as for only one; and when an estray shall be valued at more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00), an allowance shall not be made to the taker up, except the sum of Five Dollars ($5.00) herein allowed for taking up the estray, until the same shall be approved by the board of supervisors, and in no case shall the taker up receive more than half of the proceeds of sale.

And allowance shall not be made to the taker up for keeping the estray when the use of the same is equal to the expense of keeping.

For appraising estrays, to each appraiser. . . . . .50

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 459; 1892, § 2015; 1906, § 2191; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1872; 1930, § 1801; 1942, § 3949.

§ 25-7-43.
Fees for approving bond of county officer.

The president of the board of supervisors, or other officer approving the bond of any officer, shall be entitled to a fee of One Dollar ($1.00) for each bond; and where two (2) officers are engaged in approving such bond, they shall be entitled to share such fee equally. All bonds required by law to be made by assessors, chancery clerks, circuit clerks, sheriffs, tax collectors, county superintendents of education, and members of the board of supervisors shall be made in a surety company authorized to do business in this state, and the premiums thereon shall be paid out of the treasuries of the respective counties; but the fees for the approval of same shall be paid by the officer, as in other bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 467; 1892, § 2022; 1906, § 2198; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1883; 1930, § 1802; 1942, § 3950; Laws, 1922, ch. 163; Laws, 1924, ch. 206; Laws, 1926, ch. 296.

§ 25-7-45.
All officers administering oaths.

For administering and certifying an oath or affidavit. . . . .$ .25

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2027; 1906, § 2205; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1890; 1930, § 1803; 1942, § 3951.

§ 25-7-47.
Witness fees.

Witnesses in the county, circuit, chancery and justice courts shall receive the same pay per day as is set by the board of supervisors under Section 25-7-61 for service as a juror plus mileage as authorized under Section 25-3-41 for each mile going to and returning from the courthouse to their homes by the nearest route, and such tolls and ferriages as they may actually be obliged to pay; but a charge shall not be made for mileage except that traveled in this state. Witnesses in all other cases shall receive the same compensation as they receive before the circuit court. It shall not be necessary to issue subpoenas for police officers as witnesses in city cases of cities having a population of more than ten thousand (10,000) according to the federal census of 1930; and officers, when used as witnesses in cases, are not to be allowed witness fees. A law enforcement officer who has retired or otherwise ceased employment as a law enforcement officer but who is required to testify in any case based on matters that arose during the course of the officer’s employment shall be entitled to the same compensation and expenses from the former employing law enforcement agency as an officer on active duty under the same circumstances.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1595; 1892, § 2023; 1906, § 2199; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1884; 1930, § 1805; 1942, § 3953; Laws, 1936, ch. 249; Laws, 2005, ch. 385, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 374, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 25-7-49.
Law enforcement officers to receive no witness fees in criminal cases.

It shall be unlawful for any sheriff, deputy sheriff, constable, police officer, marshal, county patrolman, or any other state, county, or municipal peace or law enforcement officer to receive any fee as a witness in any criminal case in this state. The provisions of this section shall apply only when such officers are witnesses in the county or district in which such officer is serving.

Any person who shall violate the provisions of this law shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3953-01; Laws, 1944, ch. 321, §§ 1, 2.

§ 25-7-51.
Certificates for witness fees in civil cases.

The fees to which a witness may be entitled in a civil case shall be allowed on the affidavit of the witness, stating the number of days he has attended and the amount of mileage, toll, and ferriage to which he is entitled, to be taken and preserved by the clerk of the court, master, or other officer before whom the witness was called to testify; and a certificate of the allowance shall be given to the witness. A witness shall be entitled to demand, at the expiration of each day, his compensation for attending on that day; and if the same be not paid, the witness shall not be obliged to attend further until the compensation for his previous attendance shall be paid, unless the party liable make and file an affidavit of his inability to pay. The party paying a witness attending on his behalf may file the certificate of the witness among the papers in the cause and, if he recover costs therein, the amount shall be taxed in the bill of costs. Any witness may sue for and recover from the party on whose behalf he was summoned the amount specified in his certificate. Where a witness holds a certificate and the same has been duly entered on the witness docket, it may be taxed and collected as other costs.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 2200; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1885; 1930, § 1806; 1942, § 3954.

§ 25-7-53.
Forfeiture of witness fees.

A witness shall not be entitled to charge for his attendance in a civil case at any term of the court unless he shall, during the term or within five (5) days thereafter, prove his attendance and obtain a certificate in the manner directed; nor in any case, civil or criminal, shall a witness who does not appear in court when called, or who is so intoxicated as to be disqualified from testifying, be entitled to receive compensation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1597; 1892, § 2024; 1906, § 2201; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1886; 1930, § 1807; 1942, § 3955.

§ 25-7-55.
Witness to have only one fee for same time.

A witness shall not be allowed compensation for his attendance in more than one case or on more than one side of the same case at the same time, but he may elect in which of several cases and on which side of a case in which he is summoned for both sides, to claim his attendance. The party who pays a witness shall be entitled to recover of the parties in other cases who were liable to such witness a just proportion of the amount to which the witness was entitled for his attendance as the witness of such parties during the same time; and a person who is compelled to attend court on other business shall not be paid as a witness.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1598; 1892, § 2025; 1906, § 2202; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1887; 1930, § 1808; 1942, § 3956.

§ 25-7-57.
Witness in criminal cases.

Witnesses in criminal cases shall be allowed the same compensation as in civil cases, but the prosecutor shall not be allowed compensation as a witness, nor shall any person be allowed for his attendance as a witness in more than one criminal case on the same day. The compensation of witnesses on behalf of the state shall be allowed in open court, the order therefor entered upon the minutes, and a certificate of same shall be delivered to the party entitled thereto. Said certificate shall be negotiable and shall be paid by the county treasurer of the county in which the offense was committed upon presentation by the payee or the holder in due course. The clerk shall keep an account of all such certificates and shall tax the amount thereof in the bill of costs if the defendant shall be sentenced to pay the costs and, when collected, the same shall be paid into the county treasury. A witness shall not receive compensation for attendance before the grand jury.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1596; 1892, § 2026; 1906, § 2203; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1888; 1930, § 1809; 1942, § 3957; Laws, 1962, ch. 382, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 25-7-59.
Report of witness certificates payable out of county treasury.

The circuit clerk shall, within thirty (30) days after the adjournment of each term of the circuit court, make a report in writing to the county auditor of all witness certificates issued by him, payable out of the county treasury, which report shall state the name of each witness, the case, the date, and the amount of each certificate. Said report shall be certified by him under his official seal, and the county auditor shall enter the same upon the proper record in his office.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 2204; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1889; 1930, § 1810; 1942, § 3958.

§ 25-7-61.
Jurors; Lengthy Trial Fund.

[From and after January 1, 2008, or such time as the Lengthy Trial Fund is fully funded by a specific appropriation of the Legislature, whichever is later, this section shall read as follows:]

Fees of jurors shall be payable as follows:

Grand jurors and petit jurors in the chancery, county, circuit and special eminent domain courts shall be paid an amount to be set by the board of supervisors, not to be less than Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) per day and not to be greater than Forty Dollars ($40.00) per day, plus mileage authorized in Section 25-3-41. In the trial of all cases where jurors are in the charge of bailiffs and are not permitted to separate, the sheriff with the approval of the trial judge may pay for room and board of jurors on panel for actual time of trial.

No grand juror shall receive any compensation except mileage unless the juror has been sworn as provided by Section 13-5-45; and no petit juror except those jurors called on special venires shall receiveany compensation authorized under this subsection except mileage unless the juror has been sworn as provided by Section 13-5-71.

Jurors making inquisitions of intellectual disability, mental illness or unsound mind and jurors on coroner’s inquest shall be paid Five Dollars ($5.00) per day plus mileage authorized in Section 25-3-41 by the county treasurer on order of the board of supervisors on certificate of the clerk of the chancery court in which the inquisition is held.

Jurors in the justice courts shall be paid an amount of not less than Ten Dollars ($10.00) per day and not more than Fifteen Dollars ($15.00) per day, to be established by the board of supervisors. In all criminal cases in the justice court in which the prosecution fails, the fees of jurors shall be paid by the county treasurer on order of the board of supervisors on certificate of the county attorney in all counties that have county attorneys, otherwise by the justice court judge.

Any juror may return the fees provided as compensation for service as a juror to the county that paid for the person’s service as a juror. The fees returned to the county may be earmarked for a particular purpose to be selected by the juror, including:

The local public library;

Local law enforcement;

The Mississippi Burn Care Fund created in Section 7-9-70; or

Any other governmental agency.

The Administrative Office of Courts shall promulgate rules to establish a Lengthy Trial Fund to be used to provide full or partial wage replacement or wage supplementation to jurors who serve as petit jurors in civil cases for more than ten (10) days.

The Uniform Circuit and County Court Rules shall provide for the following:

The selection and appointment of an administrator for the fund.

Procedures for the administration of the fund, including payments of salaries of the administrator and other necessary personnel.

Procedures for the accounting, auditing and investment of money in the Lengthy Trial Fund.

A report by the Administrative Office of Courts on the administration of the Lengthy Trial Fund in its annual report on the judicial branch, setting forth the money collected for and disbursed from the fund.

The Lengthy Trial Fund Administrator and all other necessary personnel shall be employees of the Administrative Office of Courts.

The administrator shall use any monies deposited in the Lengthy Trial Fund to pay full or partial wage replacement or supplementation to jurors whose employers pay less than full regular wages when the period of jury service lasts more than ten (10) days.

To the extent funds are available in the Lengthy Trial Fund, and in accordance with any rules or regulations promulgated by the Administrative Office of Courts, the court may pay replacement or supplemental wages out of the Lengthy Trial Fund not to exceed Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00) per day per juror beginning on the eleventh day of jury service. In addition, for any jurors who qualify for payment by virtue of having served on a jury for more than ten (10) days, the court, upon finding that the service posed a significant financial hardship to a juror, even in light of payments made with respect to jury service after the tenth day, may award replacement or supplemental wages out of the Lengthy Trial Fund not to exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) per day from the fourth to the tenth day of jury service.

Any juror who is serving or has served on a jury that qualifies for payment from the Lengthy Trial Fund, provided the service began on or after January 1, 2008, may submit a request for payment from the Lengthy Trial Fund on a form that the administrator provides. Payment shall be limited to the difference between the jury fee specified in subsection (1) of this section and the actual amount of wages a juror earns, up to the maximum level payable, minus any amount the juror actually receives from the employer during the same time period.

The form shall disclose the juror’s regular wages, the amount the employer will pay during the term of jury service starting on the eleventh day and thereafter, the amount of replacement or supplemental wages requested, and any other information the administrator deems necessary for proper payment.

The juror also shall be required to submit verification from the employer as to the wage information provided to the administrator, for example, the employee’s most recent earnings statement or similar document, before initiation of payment from the fund.

If an individual is self-employed or receives compensation other than wages, the individual may provide a sworn affidavit attesting to his or her approximate gross weekly income, together with such other information as the administrator may require, in order to verify weekly income.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose an obligation on any county to place monies in the Lengthy Trial Fund or to pay replacement or supplemental wages to any juror from county funds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 454; 1892, § 2028; 1906, § 2207; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1892; 1930, § 1811; 1942 § 3959; Laws, 1920, ch. 143; Laws, 1932, ch. 192; Laws, 1936, ch. 248; Laws, 1946, ch. 180; Laws, 1958, ch. 324, § 2; Laws, 1962, ch. 383; Laws, 1964, ch. 365, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 420; Laws, 1975, ch. 367; Laws, 1986, ch. 459, § 32; Laws, 1989, ch. 345, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 395, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 643, § 2; Laws, 2004, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 12; Laws, 2006, ch. 437, § 7; Laws, 2007, ch. 433, § 5; Laws, 2008, ch. 442, § 11; Laws, 2010, ch. 476, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 1, 2010).

§ 25-7-63.
Determination of compensation of jurors.

The amount of compensation due to each grand juror, petit juror, and juror summoned on a special venire and regularly discharged by the court shall, after the discharge of such juror, be determined on the oath of the juror, allowed in open court, and entered on the minutes thereof. The clerk shall thereupon give a certificate of the same to the juror, and said certificate shall be negotiable and shall be paid by the county treasurer upon presentation by the payee or the holder in due course. In all other cases the court or officer before whom the juror serves shall determine the sum due and give certificate accordingly.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1698; 1892, § 2029; 1906, § 2209; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1893; 1930, § 1812; 1942, § 3960; Laws, 1962, ch. 382, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 25-7-65.
Printers and publishers.

Printers and publishers shall be entitled to the following fees:

For publishing in a newspaper any summons, order, citation, advertisement or notice required by law to be published in a newspaper, Twelve Cents (12¢) for each word it contains for the first insertion, and Ten Cents (10¢) for each of the words for each subsequent insertion required by law; however, as an alternative, such printers and publishers may charge such fees per line which are acceptable to the party placing the publication not to exceed the Twelve Cents (12¢) and Ten Cents (10¢) per word as set out in this subsection.

When four (4) or more numerals appear consecutively in any such legal publication, four (4) numerals shall be considered as one (1) word, and if there remains a fractional portion of such unit of four (4) numerals therein such fraction shall also be counted as one (1) word. In the case of numbers containing less than four (4) numerals which are isolated from other numerals by words in such publication, the same shall be counted as one (1) word. When tables or tabular matter are included, each line of the standard newspaper column shall be considered as containing at least six (6) words.

The fees authorized in this paragraph (a) shall not be chargeable for any erroneous publication of a summons, order, citation, advertisement or notice required by law to be published in a newspaper, if such error is not attributable to the person or entity requesting the publication.

For making proof of publication, making a copy thereof, and for deposing to the same, Three Dollars ($3.00); but this section shall not apply to the publication of ordinances of municipalities, proceedings of the board of supervisors and school boards or audit reports.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, §§ 461, 1638; 1892, § 2030; 1906, § 2209; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1894; 1930, § 1813; 1942, § 3961; Laws, 1920, ch. 305; Laws, 1944, ch. 320, § 2; Laws, 1948, ch. 428; Laws, 1958, ch. 331; Laws, 1972, ch. 401, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 520; Laws, 1987, ch. 474; Laws, 1998, ch. 586, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 25-7-67.
Appraisers of the estates of decedents.

The chancery court or the chancellor in vacation in each chancery court district of this state shall fix and allow reasonable compensation for appraisers in the estates of deceased persons, and said compensation shall be paid by the executor or administrator from the funds of said estate after same has been allowed by the chancery court or chancellor in vacation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 2016; 1892, § 2031; 1906, § 2210; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1895; 1930, § 1814; 1942, § 3962; Laws, 1958, ch. 283, eff 60 days from and after passage, approved Feb. 19, 1958.

§ 25-7-69.
Officers and jurors in ad quod damnum proceedings.

Each juror summoned and attending the execution of a writ ad quod damnum from the board of supervisors shall be entitled to Two Dollars ($2.00), the clerk shall be entitled to One Dollar ($1.00) for the writ, and the sheriff shall be entitled to three dollars for summoning the jury and to Three Dollars ($3.00) for his attendance upon the inquest, to be paid by the party petitioning for the writ, who may be required to give security for the payment of such fees before the writ is issued.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 941; 1892, § 2032; 1906, § 2211; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1896; 1930, § 1815; 1942, § 3963.

§ 25-7-71.
To persons bringing back prisoner on extradition.

Any party, acting under a requisition of the Governor or acting without a requisition in cases where the person to be returned has waived extradition in writing, who brings back to this state and delivers to the sheriff of the county where the offense is alleged to have been committed a person charged with felony shall receive, to be paid out of the county treasury on the order of the circuit court and of the board of supervisors, Twenty Cents (20¢) a mile for the distance necessarily traveled in coming from the place of arrest to the place of delivery; but the same shall not be paid to any party who has received or who claims a reward from the state, county, or person.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2033; 1906, § 2212; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1897; 1930, § 1816; 1942, § 3964; Laws, 1884, p 75; Laws, 1950, ch. 326.

§ 25-7-73.
Expenses of returning felon.

The circuit court or the judge thereof in vacation is hereby authorized and empowered to allow all necessary and proper expenses to any person or persons acting under a requisition of the Governor, or acting without a requisition in cases where the person to be returned has waived extradition in writing, who may travel out of this state for the purpose of identifying or assisting in any proper and necessary manner in the return to this state of a person charged with felony.

Such expenses may be allowed only upon a petition to said court or judge filed by the district attorney, setting out the necessity for the expenditure, an estimate of the probable amount to be spent, the name of the person charged with felony, the crime with which such person is charged, and the place to which the proposed trip will be made. If, upon the hearing of said petition, the circuit court or judge is satisfied of the necessity of the expenditure, an order authorizing the same may be entered to that effect; and thereafter, upon sworn itemized statement of such expenses, the court or judge shall, if such expenses are reasonable and proper, enter an order allowing the same, which order, upon presentation to the board of supervisors of the county in which such person is charged with felony, shall be allowed by said board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3965; Laws, 1932, ch. 139; Laws, 1950, ch. 325.

§ 25-7-75.
Expenses of returning certain prisoners to other states.

When it is desired to have returned to this state a person charged in this state with a crime, and such person is imprisoned or is held under criminal proceedings then pending against him in another state or territory or the District of Columbia, the Governor of this state may agree with the executive authority of such other state or territory for the extradition of such person before the conclusion of such proceedings or his term of sentence in such other state or territory or the District of Columbia, upon condition that such person be returned to such other state or territory at the expense of this state as soon as the prosecution in this state is terminated. The expenses of returning such prisoners to other states shall be paid out of an appropriation to be made for that purpose known as “the prisoner extradition fund.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3965.5; Laws, 1968, ch. 352, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 20, 1968).

§ 25-7-77.
Fees for attachment for rent.

The officer issuing an attachment or distress for rent or supplies furnished by a landlord to a tenant, shall be entitled to One Dollar and Fifty Cents ($1.50) for the affidavit, bond, and writ, to be paid by the party obtaining them, which shall be collected with the rent or other demand and be refunded to such party. The officer serving the attachment shall be entitled to the same fees and commissions as are allowed to sheriffs for serving an attachment against an absconding debtor and making the money thereon.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1329; 1892, § 2034; 1906, § 2213; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1898; 1930, § 1817; 1942, § 3966.

§ 25-7-79.
Fees of officers and witness in unlawful entry and detainer court.

The justices holding a court for the trial of an unlawful entry and detainer shall each be entitled to Two Dollars ($2.00) a day for attending the trial; and other fees of witnesses and officers for services rendered in relation to the proceeding and trial shall be the same as the fees for similar services in the circuit court, and shall be taxed in the costs.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 2662; 1892, § 2035; 1906, § 2214; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1899; 1930, § 1818; 1942, § 3967.

§ 25-7-81.
Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State shall charge the following fees:

For every commission issued by him to persons appointed by the Governor as a commissioner of this state in any other state, territory, or district of the United States, or in any foreign country. . . . .$10.00

For recording charter of a corporation for literary, religious, benevolent, fraternal, or scientific purposes, and not for pecuniary profits, directly or indirectly. . . . .20.00

For commission of each notary public. . . . .25.00

For commission of each commissioner of deeds. . . . .10.00

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, §§ 1030, 1642; 1892, § 2037; 1906, § 2216; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1901; 1930, § 1820; 1942, § 3969; Laws, 1920, ch. 109; Laws, 1958, ch. 346, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 431, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 25-7-83.
Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

The auditor of public accounts shall charge the following fees:

The auditor shall be entitled to charge and receive of persons paying taxes to him five per centum thereon.

For each transcript from land records, containing official certificate and not more than five land descriptions. . . . .$1.50

For each additional land description over five. . . . .1.00

For each official certificate other than land record transcript. . . . ..15

And, in addition, on each hundred words over one hundred. . . . ..15

For receiving, examining, and filing each insurance statement and issuing authority. . . . .5.00

The auditor shall make all necessary transcripts of the records of his office relating to lands sold for taxes and certified into the land office, and give all necessary certificates concerning them from the records in his office. He shall collect the proper fees therefor and pay the same over to the land commissioner for payment into the state treasury.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, §§ 514, 563, 567, 575; 1892, § 2038; 1906, § 2217; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1902; 1930, § 1821; 1942, § 3970.

§ 25-7-85.
Secretary of State; fee relating to land transactions.

The Secretary of State shall charge, collect and pay into the State Treasury the following fees, viz:

a. For each application filed for the purchase of tax-forfeited property
$2.50 b. For copy of patent 2.00 c. For certificate from 1875 to date, certifying each and every sale and disposition by the state 5.00 d. For certificate of land records information 2.00 e. For copy of any land record, not certified 1.00 f. Photostat copies of plats and field notes, as follows: Size of Sheet Per Page 8 1/2" x 11" and under $0.50 Over 8 1/2" x 11" and not more than 8 1/2" x 14" .60 Over 8 1/2" x 14" and not more than 18" x 24" 1.20 All over 18" x 24" 2.00

Click to view

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2039; 1906, § 2218; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1903; 1930, § 1822; 1942, § 3971; Laws, 1958, ch. 353; Laws, 1978, ch. 458, § 18, eff from and after January 1, 1980.

§ 25-7-87.
Fees of state officers to be paid into Treasury.

It shall be the duty of all state officers who receive a salary to continue to collect the fees or perquisites required of them by any law. Each of said officers shall keep a detailed account of such collections among the official receipts of his office and pay them in full into the state treasury on the first Monday of each month. The payment shall be accompanied by the affidavit of the officer averring that he has collected all fees allowed by law for all work performed by him during the preceding month, and showing the amount thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2040; 1906, § 2219; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1904; 1930, §§ 1823, 6513; 1942, §§ 3972, 4178.

§ 25-7-89.
Fee for transcript of testimony and exhibits to testimony, or copy of such transcript and exhibits.

Each court reporter shall receive Two Dollars and Forty Cents ($2.40) per page for each transcript of testimony, or copy of such transcript, which shall be taxed as costs to each party or individual who may obtain such transcript or copy thereof. The court reporter shall file with the clerk an original and one (1) copy of the transcript, for which copy no charge shall be made.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 643, § 3; Laws, 2004, ch. 446, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2004.